Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 328.23, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 328.23. A. The President of the Board of Dentistry,
upon verification that a person meets the requirements provided for
in this section and any other requirements provided for in the State
Dental Act, may issue an emergency temporary license to practice
dentistry for thirty (30) days. A temporary license may be extended
but shall not exceed ninety (90) days or the next available
regularly scheduled Board meeting.
B. The President of the Board, upon verification that a person
meets the requirements provided for in the State Dental Act, may
Req. No. 14075 Page 1

issu e an emergency temporary license to practice dental hygiene,
which shall expire as of the date of the next dental hygiene
clinical examination in Oklahoma, as required by the Board.
C. An active duty military spouse residing with the active duty
member having met the requirements for licensure shall be eligible
for a temporary license.
D. Any applicant requesting an emergency temporary license
shall submit a letter explaining the exigent circumstances along
with all application materials. The determination of whether or not
to grant the emergency temporary license based upon the exigent
circumstances shall be at the sole discretion of the President or
acting President of the Board.
E. A holder of a temporary license to practice dentistry or
dental hygiene shall have the same rights and privileges and be
governed by the State Dental Act and the rules of the Board in the
same manner as a holder of a permanent license to practice dentistry
and dental hygiene.
F. The President of the Board may authorize patient treatment
and care by individuals taking the Commission on Dental Competency
Assessments (CDCA) or the Western Regional Examining Board exam, or
other regional exams as approved by the Board, in order for such
individuals to complete criteria related to Board examinations. The
Board may authorize specialty examinations to be given throughout
the year as needed.
Req. No. 14075 Page 2

G. A foreign-trained dentist may apply for limited temporary
licensure not to exceed five (5) years. The Board may issue a
limited temporary license to foreign-trained dentists upon
determining that the applicant has:
1. Provided proof of graduation from a dental school whose
curriculum is substantially equivalent to that of an accredited U.S.
dental school, as determined by the Board;
2. Provided proof of successful completion of the ADEX Dental
Licensure Examination;
3. Provided documentation of passing scores on the Integrated
National Board Dental Examination (INDBE) or a clinical licensing
examination recognized by the Board;
4. Completed a two- or three-year postgraduate training program
in the field of Periodontics or Prosthodontics in the applicant's
licensing country;
5. Practiced as a licensed dentist for at least three (3) of
the last five (5) years outside of the United States;
6. Paid any application or examination fees as set by the
Board;
7. Demonstrated competency as determined by the Board;
8. Demonstrated sufficient evidence of good moral character;
and
9. Submitted evidence of a bona fide offer of employment at an
employer operating in a qualifying setting in this state, limited to
Req. No. 14075 Page 3

a pu blic health program, hospital, Federally Qualified Health Center
(FQHC), or accredited educational institution in this state, to
perform services aligning with the applicant's qualifications and
experience.
H. A foreign-trained dentist holding a limited temporary
license shall be subject to the following conditions:
1. Provide dental services on in the qualifying settings
described in paragraph 9 of subsection G of this section; and
2. Be supervised by a licensed dentist in this state, who will
assume professional responsibility for all care rendered.
I. A foreign-trained dentist may apply for dental hygienist
license in this state. The Board may issue a dental hygienist
license to a foreign-trained dentist upon determining the applicant
has:
1. Been lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry for at
least three (3) years in a foreign jurisdiction that regulates
dental licensure;
2. Provided proof of successful completion of the ADEX Dental
Hygiene Licensure Examination;
3. Provided a certificate of registration and verification of
duration of practice from the appropriate dental regulatory
authority in the foreign jurisdiction;
4. Demonstrated that the education and clinical training
received abroad is substantially equivalent to the standards
Req. No. 14075 Page 4

requ ired of dental hygienists in this state, as determined by the
Board; and
5. If recommended by the Board, completed a course and
evaluation of skills at the OU College of Dentistry.
Upon the applicant's meeting these requirements and any others
as established by rule, the Board may issue a license to the
applicant to practice dental hygiene under the State Dental Act.
J. Any foreign-trained applicant must demonstrate proficiency
in the English language satisfactory to the Board, as verified by
passing a Board-approved examination.
K. All credentials, diplomas, and other required documentation
in a foreign language submitted to the Board must be accompanied by
notarized English translations. Foreign applicants must provide
satisfactory evidence of lawful status in the United States, as
defined by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services
(USCIS).
L. The Board shall promulgate rules and regulations for the
implementation, oversight, and renewal of temporary licenses for
foreign-trained dentists in accordance with the Oklahoma
Administrative Procedures Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14075 TKR 01/06/26

Req. No. 14075 Page 5